Washington statutes.
RCW 21.30.130

Violations—Court-ordered remedies—Penalties—Bond by director not required.

(1)(a) Upon a proper showing by the director that a person has violated, or is about to violate, this chapter or any rule or order of the department, the superior court may grant appropriate legal or equitable remedies.

(b) Upon showing of violation of this chapter or a rule or order of the director or administrator, the court, in addition to legal and equitable remedies otherwise available, including temporary restraining orders, permanent or temporary prohibitory or mandatory injunctions, and writs of prohibition or mandamus, may grant the following special remedies:

(i) Imposition of a civil penalty in an amount which may not exceed ten thousand dollars for any single violation or one hundred thousand dollars for multiple violations in a single proceeding or a series of related proceedings;

(ii) Disgorgement;

(iii) Declaratory judgment;

(iv) Restitution to investors wishing restitution; and

(v) Appointment of a receiver or conservator for the defendant or the defendant's assets.

(c) Appropriate remedies when the defendant is shown only about to violate this chapter or a rule or order of the department shall be limited to:

(i) A temporary restraining order;

(ii) A temporary or permanent injunction; or

(iii) A writ of prohibition or mandamus.

(2) The court shall not require the director to post a bond in any official action under this chapter.

[ 1986 c 14 s 13.]